src/propernoun-smj-morph.txt
LEXICON BERN
 +N+Prop:%> BERNDECL ;
 
LEXICON BERNDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE ;

LEXICON BERNDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub:a LASJ ; !
 
LEXICON BERNDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:a LASJ ; !


LEXICON BERNUCASE ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an K ;
 +Sg+Ela:as K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj RHyph ;      
 +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ajs K ;
 +Pl+Com:aj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn K ;

LEXICON BERNUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a RHyph ;       
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an K ;
 +Sg+Ela:as K ;
! +Pl+Nom:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aj K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aj RHyph ;      
! +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ajs K ;
! +Pl+Com:aj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn K ;


LEXICON BERNUCASE-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom: K ; 
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:an K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a RHyph ; !
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av K ; !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ; !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:aj RHyph ; !
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ajt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ajda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ajs K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:aj K ; !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ajn K ; !



LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 +N+Prop+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:%>is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. 
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 
LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; 

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON LONDON-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malsur
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%> LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ; 

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; 

!LEXICON LONDON-surplc
! +N+Prop+Plc:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
! +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Org:%> LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDON-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> LONDONDECL-LOAN ; 


!LEXICON LONDON ! Not in use, removed.
! +N+Prop:%> LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON LONDONDECL-LOAN
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

 
LEXICON LONDONUCASE ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a RHyph ;              
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;	   !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;	   !
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij RHyph ;             
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;
 
LEXICON LONDONUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a RHyph ;              
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;   
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;	   !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;	   !
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
! +Pl+Nom:a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ij RHyph ;             
! +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:ij K ;

 
LEXICON LONDONUCASE-LOAN ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:a RHyph ;   !            
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:av K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:ij K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:in K ; !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:is K ; !
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:aj K ;    !
 +Sg+Ine+Use/Sub:an K ;	   !
 +Sg+Ela+Use/Sub:as K ;	   !
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:ijn K ; !
 +Ess+Use/Sub:in K ; !
! +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:a K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ij K ; !
! +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:ij RHyph ;      !        
! +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:ijt K ; !
! +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:ijda K ; !
! +Pl+Ine+Use/Sub:ijn K ; !
! +Pl+Ela+Use/Sub:ijs K ; !
! +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:ij K ; !




LEXICON ANAR-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> ANARDECL ; 

LEXICON ANAR-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON ANAR
! +N+Prop:%> ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;

LEXICON ANARDECL_PLC-ORG ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON ANAR-OBL
LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR-OBL_PLC-ORG
LONDONDECL_PLC-ORG ;



LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%> VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from DAVVISUOLU
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL 
 +Sg+Nom:Q3j K ;
 +Ess:Q3n K ;
 +CmpN/SgN:Q3j RHyph ;        
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
! +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +Ess:n K ;
 
!LEXICON DUORTNUS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS
! +N+Prop:%> DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ LASJ; !


LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 :Q1 NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;                 
 +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a RHyph ;              
 +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
 +Ess:X5in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij RHyph ;             
 +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 :Q1 NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;                 
 +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a RHyph ;              
 +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
 +Ess:X5in K ;
! +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5ij RHyph ;             
! +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
! +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani:%> HEANDARATDECL ;

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> HEANDARATDECL ;
 
LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>aQ1 VUONAK ;



!LEXICON HEANDARAT ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> HEANDARATDECL ;
 
!LEXICON HEANDARATDECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE ;
  
LEXICON HEANDARATDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
  +Use/Sub: LASJ ;


!LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
! +Sg+Nom:a K ;
! +Sg+Nom:a RHyph ;                        
! +Ess:an K ;
! +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
! +Sg+Gen:aQ1 RHyph ;      
! +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
! +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
! +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
! +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

LEXICON HEANDARATUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom:a K ;
 +Sg+Nom:a RHyph ;                        
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON BASUDIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> BASUDISDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  BASUDISDECL ; 
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> BASUDISDECL ;
 
LEXICON BASUDIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  BASUDISDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>aQ1 VUONAK ;



!LEXICON BASUDIS ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop:%> BASUDISDECL ;
 
LEXICON BASUDISDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE ;

LEXICON BASUDISDECL_PLC-ORG
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BASUDISUCASE_PLC-ORG ;
 +Use/Sub: LASJ; !

LEXICON BASUDISUCASE ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;                        
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;     
 +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
 +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

LEXICON BASUDISUCASE_PLC-ORG ! Bisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: RHyph ;                        
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:aQ1 RHyph ;      
 +Sg+Acc:aQ1v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:aQ1n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:aQ1s K ;
! +Pl+Nom:aQ1 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j K ;
! +Pl+Gen:aQ1j RHyph ;     
! +Pl+Acc:aQ1jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:aQ1jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:aQ1jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:aQ1js K ;
! +Pl+Com:aQ1j K ;
 +Sg+Com:aQ1X5jn K ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj:%> GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  GEAVNNISDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;
 
LEXICON GEAVNNIS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  GEAVNNISDECL_PLC-ORG ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Y7 VUONAK ;
 
!LEXICON GEAVNNIS
! +N+Prop:%> GEAVNNISDECL ;

!LEXICON GEAVNNISDECL
! @U.Cap.Obl@ GEAVNNISUCASE ;
